Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Operation and Powers
7-39-309. Lien of bonds.

All bonds of the same issue shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding bonds, claims or obligation, have a prior and paramount lien on the revenue of the properties for which the bonds have been issued, over and ahead of all bonds of any issue payable from the revenue that may be subsequently issued, and over and ahead of any claims or obligations of any nature against the revenue subsequently arising or subsequently incurred; provided, that the proceedings authorizing any issue of bonds may provide for the issuance of additional bonds on a parity with the bonds.

All bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, of sale, or execution, or of delivery, by a lien on the revenue in accordance with this chapter and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds.

Any pledge of, or lien on, revenues and receipts of the corporation to secure the payment of any bonds, notes or obligations of the corporation issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of the holder or holders of such bonds or notes or the obligee under any such obligation until the payment or satisfaction in full of the pledge or lien. The priority of any pledge or lien with respect to competing pledges or liens shall be determined by the date such pledge or lien is created or granted. Neither the resolution, the indenture, nor any other instrument granting, creating or giving notice of the pledge or lien need be filed or recorded to preserve or protect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 15; T.C.A., § 6-4215; Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 19.

7-39-310. Nonprofit corporation — Net earnings.

The corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors of the corporation shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds or other obligations of the corporation, then any net earnings of the corporation thereafter accruing from gas properties or rights shall be paid to the municipal gas distribution system or systems for the benefit of which the corporation was organized, and any net earnings of the corporation thereafter accruing from electrical power properties or rights shall be paid to the municipal electrical power distribution system or systems for the benefit of which the corporation was organized.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 16; T.C.A., § 6-4216; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 17.

7-39-311. Exemption from Tennessee public utility commission jurisdiction.

The exemption heretofore granted to municipalities from the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission is hereby granted to any energy acquisition corporation.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 17; T.C.A., § 6-4217; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 75; 1997, ch. 93, § 18; 2017, ch. 94, § 12.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Municipalities exempt from regulation, §§7-34-106,7-34-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 2.

7-39-312. Incorporation — Names — Board of directors — Associated municipalities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9, to the contrary, the following provisions shall apply to any energy acquisition corporation:

An energy acquisition corporation is deemed to be a “public agency,” as defined in § 12-9-103, for all purposes of the Interlocal Cooperation Act. Specifically, but not limited to, one (1) or more energy acquisition corporations may act jointly with each other or with other public agencies in the exercise of their powers as provided in § 12-9-104. In addition, an energy acquisition corporation may, pursuant to § 12-9-108, contract with other public agencies, whether within or outside this state, to perform any service, activity or undertaking authorized by this chapter, and in such event any such other public agency shall be deemed to be the corporation's “associated municipality” for purposes of § 7-39-304, but not for any other purposes of this chapter, and may also contract with any other person or entity, either within or outside this state, to perform any service, activity or undertaking authorized by this chapter;

An energy acquisition corporation may be incorporated under § 7-39-201 to act on behalf of two (2) or more municipalities, each of which shall be deemed to be the “associated municipality” for all purposes of this chapter, and all provisions of this chapter, as nearly as may be practicable, shall be made applicable to such corporation and each associated municipality, subject to the following:

The persons filing the application for incorporation under § 7-39-201 must include at least one (1) applicant who meets the qualifications of an incorporator as set forth in § 7-39-103 from each municipality, and such application must be approved by the governing body of each municipality;

The name of the corporation need not include the name of each associated municipality, or any of them; and

The board of directors may, but shall not be required to, include a member who meets the qualifications of a director as set forth in § 7-39-103 for each associated municipality; provided, that each board member shall meet the qualifications of a director as set forth in § 7-39-103 in one (1) or more of such municipalities; and members of the board may be nominated and elected, and may be removed for cause, in any manner provided in the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation or by resolution of the board of directors of the corporation; and

An energy acquisition corporation may be joined by any one (1) or more municipalities, each of which shall be deemed to be an “associated municipality” for purposes of this chapter, and all provisions of this chapter shall, as nearly as may be practicable, be made applicable to such corporation and each such associated municipality, subject to the requirements of subdivision (2) and subject to the following:

Each municipality seeking to become an “associated municipality” of such corporation must make application in writing to the board of directors of such corporation to become an “associated municipality,” following approval of such application by resolution of the governing body of such municipality; and

The board of directors of such corporation must approve the application of such municipality to become an “associated municipality” of such corporation.

Acts 1995, ch. 336, § 1; 1997, ch. 93, §§ 19-24; 1997, ch. 307, § 1; 1999, ch. 345, §§ 20-23.

7-39-313. Deposit and investment of funds.

All funds of a corporation shall be deposited in accordance with title 9, chapter 4, parts 1, 4 and 5; provided, that any bank, savings and loan institution or savings bank located outside the state of Tennessee that is under the supervision of the United States comptroller of the currency or the office of thrift supervision, may act as a depository, trustee, registration agent or paying agent in connection with any bonds or notes issued by a corporation, notwithstanding title 9, chapter 4, parts 1, 4 and 5.

Funds of a corporation are authorized to be invested in the following:

Direct obligations of the United States government or any of its agencies;

Obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States government or any of its agencies;

Certificates of deposit and other evidences of deposit at state and federally chartered banks, savings and loan institutions or savings banks deposited and collateralized as described in subsection (a);

Repurchase agreements entered into with the United States or its agencies or with any bank, broker-dealer or other such entity, so long as the obligation of the obligated party is secured by a perfected pledge of full faith and credit obligations of the United States or its agencies;

Guaranteed investment contracts or similar agreements providing for a specified rate of return over a specified time period with entities rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency;

The local government investment pool created by title 9, chapter 4, part 7;

Direct general obligations of a state of the United States, or a political subdivision or instrumentality of a state, having general taxing powers and rated in either of the three (3) highest rating categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations; or

Obligations of any state of the United States or a political subdivision or instrumentality of any state, secured solely by revenues received by or on behalf of the state or political subdivision or instrumentality of the state irrevocably pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on such obligations, rated in the three (3) highest rating categories by a nationally recognized rating agency of such obligations.

Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 24; 2014, ch. 522, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-39-313, relating to power to purchase natural gas or electric power, was transferred to §7-39-316 in 1999.

7-39-314. Audits.

Any corporation formed pursuant to this chapter shall be audited in the manner provided in title 6, chapter 56.

Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-39-314, concerning restrictions or limitations on corporate powers, was transferred to §7-39-318 in 1999.

7-39-315. Board of directors is a governing body.

The board of directors of a corporation formed pursuant to this chapter shall be considered a governing body for purposes of title 8, chapter 44.

Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 24.

7-39-316. Power to purchase natural gas or electrical power.

Any municipality has the power, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance thereof, exercisable alone or jointly with any other public agency, acting by resolution of its governing body, to purchase, by contract or other agreement, natural gas or electrical power, or both, from an energy acquisition corporation. Any municipality has the power to enter into any contract or arrangement with a corporation for the acquisition of natural gas or natural gas substitutes or electrical power, containing such terms, covenants, representations, warranties and provisions and for such period or duration as the governing body of the municipality shall determine, including contracts containing the agreement of the municipality to take or pay for any gas, gas substitutes or electrical power provided by the corporation to the municipality.

Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 25; Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 24.

7-39-317. Competitive bidding requirements waived.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a corporation may enter into any contract authorized by this chapter without complying with competitive bidding requirements.

Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 24.

7-39-318. Restrictions or limitations on corporate powers.

Neither this chapter nor anything contained in this chapter shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that a corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers; however, to the extent this chapter conflicts with any other law or is inconsistent with any other law, this chapter shall prevail. The authority and powers granted pursuant to this chapter may be exercised in accordance with the terms of this chapter, notwithstanding any other requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any general law, private act or home rule charter, and notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary contained in any general law, private act or home rule charter.

Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 25; 1999, ch. 345, § 24.

7-39-319. Option of energy acquisition corporation to be governed by this section.

Notwithstanding this chapter or the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9, to the contrary, subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) shall apply to any energy acquisition corporation that elects, either in its certificate of incorporation or in its bylaws, to be governed by this section:

An energy acquisition corporation operating pursuant to this section shall have a board of directors of not less than three (3) nor more than twenty-one (21) members;

Not less than two thirds (2/3) of the members shall meet the qualifications to serve as director pursuant to § 7-39-103, including directors serving on behalf of one (1) or more municipalities that have become associated municipalities pursuant to § 7-39-312. Up to one third (1/3) of the members need not meet the qualifications to serve as director pursuant to § 7-39-103; provided, that each such member is a natural person and is either an employee of a municipal utility, an employee of an electric cooperative or an employee or member of the governing body of a G&T cooperative;

Members of the board may be nominated and elected, and may be removed for cause, in any manner provided in the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation; provided, that the terms of office of directors nominated and elected pursuant to this subdivision (a)(3) shall be distributed evenly, as nearly as may be practicable, among all terms of office of the directors of the corporation; and

No more than one (1) person per associated municipality, one (1) person per municipal utility that is not an associated municipality, one (1) person per electric cooperative and one (1) person per G&T cooperative shall serve on the board of directors of the corporation at any one time.

As used in this section:

“Electric cooperative” means an electric cooperative or electric membership corporation, whether organized or operating under title 48, chapter 25, or similar statutes of any other state, that, as of June 23, 2009, distributes electric power purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority;

“G&T cooperative” means a generation and transmission cooperative, organized or operating under the Electric G&T Cooperative Act, compiled in title 48, chapter 69; and

“Municipal utility” means any governmental entity having a system for the distribution of electricity, whether operated under the authority of a board of the governmental entity, a department of the governmental entity or under the authority of a board created pursuant to chapter 52 of this title or by the authority of any other public or private act of the general assembly or pursuant to the charter of a municipality, and that operates an electric generation or distribution system that, as of June 23, 2009, distributes electricity purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority and also includes any municipality, county or other political subdivision of another state, whether operated under a board or as a county or municipal department that, as of June 23, 2009, distributes electricity purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority.

Acts 2009, ch. 475, § 2.